Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.20, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prohibition. (a) It is unlawful for a person, either directly or indirectly, to deny access to an apartment house, dormitory, nursing home, manufactured home park, other multiple unit facility used as a residence, or an area in which two or more single-family dwellings are located on private roadways to new text begin an elected official or to new text end a candidate who has: (1) organized a campaign committee under applicable federal or state law; (2) filed a financial report as required by section 211A.02; or (3) filed an affidavit of candidacy for elected office. deleted text begin Adeleted text end new text begin An elected official ornew text end candidate granted access under this section must be allowed to be accompanied by deleted text begin campaigndeleted text end new text begin staff ornew text end volunteers. (b) Access to a facility or area is only required if it is located within the district or territory that new text begin is represented by the elected official or new text end will be represented by the office to which the candidate seeks election, and the new text begin elected official or new text end candidate and any accompanying deleted text begin campaigndeleted text end new text begin staff ornew text end volunteers seek access exclusively for deleted text begin the purpose ofdeleted text end new text begin purposes related to the official work of the elected official,new text end campaigning for a candidatenew text begin ,new text end or registering voters. deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin An elected official must be currently serving in office. Anew text end candidate must be seeking election to office at the next general or special election to be held for that office. (c) deleted text begin Adeleted text end new text begin An elected official ornew text end candidate and any accompanying deleted text begin campaigndeleted text end new text begin staff ornew text end volunteers granted access under this section must be permitted to knock on the doors of individual units to speak with residents, and to leavenew text begin materials related to the official work of the elected official ornew text end campaign materials for residents at their doors, except that the manager of a nursing home may direct that deleted text begin the campaigndeleted text end new text begin anynew text end materials be left at a central location within the facility. The deleted text begin campaigndeleted text end materials must be left in an orderly manner. (d) If a facility or area contains multiple buildings, deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin an elected official ornew text end candidate and accompanying new text begin staff or new text end volunteers must be permitted to access more than one building on a single visit, but access is limited to only one building at a time. If multiple new text begin elected officials or new text end candidates are traveling together, each new text begin elected official or new text end candidate and that new text begin official's or new text end candidate's accompanying new text begin staff or new text end volunteers deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin arenew text end limited to one building at a time, but all of the new text begin officials and new text end candidates and accompanying new text begin staff or new text end volunteers traveling together must not be restricted to accessing the same building at the same time. (e) A violation of this section is a petty misdemeanor. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 211B.20, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exceptions. Subdivision 1 does not prohibit: (1) denial of admittance into a particular apartment, room, manufactured home, or personal residential unit; (2) requiring reasonable and proper identification as a necessary prerequisite to admission to a multiple unit dwelling; (3) in the case of a nursing home or an assisted living facility under chapter 144G, denial of permission to visit certain persons for valid health reasons; (4) limiting visits by new text begin elected officials or new text end candidatesnew text begin , or staffnew text end or volunteers accompanied by the new text begin official or new text end candidatenew text begin ,new text end to a reasonable number of persons or reasonable hours, provided that access must be permitted during the hours of 9:00 a.m. through 9:00 p.m. on any day, at a minimum; (5) requiring a prior appointment to gain access to the facility; or (6) denial of admittance to or expulsion from a multiple unit dwelling for good cause. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 211B.20, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notice to residents. The owner, manager, or operator of a multiple unit dwelling is encouraged to notify residents of the days on which deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin an elected official ornew text end candidate has provided notice of an intent to be present. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.20, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "elected official" means an individual who was elected to or appointed to an elected federal, statewide, legislative, judicial, or local office, including special districts, school districts, towns, home rule charter and statutory cities, and counties, except president and vice president of the United States and presidential electors. new text end